Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6101.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406qq. (1) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall cap any co-pay or coinsurance, as applicable, for insulin products selected by the insurer at an amount not to exceed $35.00 for each 30-day supply of selected insulin products. The co-pay or coinsurance cap must be applied to at least 1 insulin product, as selected by the insurer, within each of the following categories: (a) Rapid-acting. (b) Short-acting. (c) Intermediate-acting. (d) Long-acting. (e) Ultra-long-acting. (f) Premixed. (2) An insurer cannot achieve compliance with this section by increasing cost-sharing requirements, reclassifying benefits with respect to selected insulin products by the insurer, or imposing more restrictive treatment limitations on selected insulin products. (3) This section does not prevent an insurer described in subsection (1) from doing either of the following: (a) Reducing a co-pay or coinsurance, as applicable, for a covered selected insulin product to an amount less than $35.00 for each 30-day supply of the selected insulin product. (b) Imposing a co-pay or coinsurance for a covered benefit that is not a selected insulin product at an amount that exceeds $35.00. (4) Beginning July 1, 2027 and each July 1 after that date, the director shall adjust the dollar amount under subsections (1) and (3) in accordance with the Consumer Price Index. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. (b) "Cost-sharing requirement" means deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, out-of-pocket expenses, aggregate lifetime limits, and annual limits. (c) "Selected insulin product" means an insulin product selected by the insurer in accordance with subsection (1). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act applies to health insurance policies delivered, executed, issued, amended, adjusted, or renewed in this state, or outside of this state if covering residents of this state, after June 30, 2026.